Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.070

Inventory—List of claims.

Upon taking possession of such corporation, the director shall make an inventory of the assets in duplicate and file one in his or her office and one in the office of the county clerk. Upon the expiration of the time fixed for the presentation of claims, he or she shall make a duplicate list of claims presented, segregating those approved and those rejected, to be filed as aforesaid. He or she shall also make and file a supplemental list of claims at least fifteen days before the declaration of any dividend, and in any event at least every six months.

[ 1994 c 92 s 113; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.070. Prior: 1917 c 80 s 65; 1915 c 98 s 6; RRS s 3272. Formerly RCW 30.44.070.]